California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
is stated in the affidvit that such person is dead, the plaintiff may join as defendants “the testate and intestate successors of ____ (naming the deceased person), deceased, and all persons claiming by, through, or under such decedent,” naming them in that manner.

(3) Where it is stated in the affidavit that such person is believed to be dead, the plaintiff may join the person as a defendant, and may also join “the testate and intestate successors of ____ (naming the person) believed to be deceased, and all persons claiming by, through, or under such person,” naming them in that manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.040.

The court upon its own motion may, and upon motion of any party shall, make such orders as appear appropriate:

(a) For joinder of such additional parties as are necessary or proper.

(b) Requiring the plaintiff to procure a title report and designate a place where it shall be kept for inspection, use, and copying by the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.050.

Any person who has a claim to the property described in the complaint may appear in the proceeding. Whether or not the person is named as a defendant in the complaint, the person shall appear as a defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.060.

(a) In addition to the persons required to be named as defendants in the action, the plaintiff may name as defendants “all persons unknown, claiming any legal or equitable right, title, estate, lien, or interest in the property described in the complaint adverse to plaintiff’s title, or any cloud upon plaintiff’s title thereto,” naming them in that manner.

(b) In an action under this section, the plaintiff shall name as defendants the persons having adverse claims that are of record or known to the plaintiff or reasonably apparent from an inspection of the
property.

(c) If the plaintiff admits the validity of any adverse claim, the complaint shall so state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.070.

A person named and served as an unknown defendant has the same rights as are provided by law in cases of all other defendants named and served, and the action shall proceed against unknown defendants in the same manner as against other defendants named and served, and with the same effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.080.

The court upon its own motion may, and upon motion of any party shall, make such orders for appointment of guardians ad litem as appear necessary to protect the interest of any party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.090.

(a) The state may be joined as a party to an action under this chapter.

(b) This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Service of Process [763.010. - 763.040.]

763.010.

(a) The form, content, and manner of the service of summons shall be the same as in civil actions generally.

(b) If upon affidavit it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the plaintiff has used reasonable diligence to ascertain the identity and residence of and to serve summons on the persons named as unknown defendants and persons joined as testate or intestate successors of a person known or believed to be dead, the court shall order service by publication pursuant to Section 415.50 and the provisions of this article. The court may, in its discretion,
appoint a referee to investigate whether the plaintiff has used reasonable diligence to ascertain the identity and residence of persons sought to be served by publication, and the court may rely on the report of the referee instead of the affidavit of the plaintiff in making the order for service by publication.

(c) Nothing in this section authorizes service by publication upon any person named as an unknown defendant who is in open and actual possession of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

763.020.

Whenever the court orders service by publication, the order is subject to the following conditions:

(a) The plaintiff shall post, not later than 10 days after the date the order is made, a copy of the summons and complaint in a conspicuous place on the real property that is the subject of the action.

(b) The plaintiff shall record, if not already recorded, a notice of the pendency of the action.

(c) The publication shall describe the property that is the
subject of the action. In addition to particularly describing the property, the publication shall describe the property by giving its street address, if any, or other common designation, if any; but, if a legal description of the property is given, the validity of the publication shall not be affected by the fact that the street address or other common designation recited is erroneous or that the street address or other common designation is omitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

763.030.

(a) Whenever the court orders service by publication, the publication may:

(1) Name only the defendants to be served thereby.

(2) Describe only the property in which the defendants to be served thereby claim interests.

(b) Judgment against a defendant who fails to appear and answer following service under this section shall be conclusive against the defendant named in respect only to property described in the
publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

763.040.

Whenever the court orders service by publication, the court before hearing the case shall require proof that the summons has been served, posted, published as required, and that the notice of pendency of action has been filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Judgment [764.010. - 764.080.]

764.010.

The court shall examine into and determine the plaintiff’s title against the claims of all the defendants. The court shall not enter judgment by default but shall in all cases require evidence of plaintiff’s title and hear such evidence as may be offered respecting the claims of any of the defendants, other than claims the validity of which is admitted by the plaintiff in the complaint. The court shall render judgment in accordance with the evidence and the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

764.020.

(a) If in an action under this chapter the validity or interpretation of a gift, devise, bequest, or trust, under a will or instrument purporting to be a will, whether admitted to probate or not, is involved:

(1) The will or instrument purporting to be a will is admissible in evidence. 

(2) All questions concerning the validity of the gift, devise, bequest, or trust shall be finally determined in the action.

(3) If the will has been
admitted to probate and the gift, devise, bequest, or trust has been interpreted by a final decree of the probate court, the interpretation is conclusive as to the proper construction thereof.

(b) Nothing in this section deprives a party of the right to a jury trial in any case where, by law, the right is now given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

764.030.

The judgment in the action is binding and conclusive on all of the following persons, regardless of any legal disability:

(a) All persons known and unknown who were parties to the action and who have any claim to the property, whether present or future, vested or contingent, legal or equitable, several or undivided.

(b) Except as provided in Section 764.045, all persons who were not parties to the action and who have any claim to the property which was not of record at the time the lis pendens was filed or, if none was
filed, at the time the judgment was recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

764.045.

Except to the extent provided in Section 1908, the judgment does not affect a claim in the property or part thereof of any person who was not a party to the action if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The claim was of record at the time the lis pendens was filed or, if none was filed, at the time the judgment was recorded.

(b) The claim was actually known to the plaintiff or would have been reasonably apparent from an inspection of the property at the time the lis pendens was filed or, if none was filed, at
the time the judgment was entered. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impair the rights of a bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer for value dealing with the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s successors in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 20, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

764.060.

The relief granted in an action or proceeding directly or collaterally attacking the judgment in the action, whether based on lack of actual notice to a party or otherwise, shall not impair the rights of a purchaser or encumbrancer for value of the property acting in reliance on the judgment without knowledge of any defects or irregularities in the judgment or the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

764.070.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the judgment in the action is not binding or conclusive on the following:

(a) The state, unless individually joined as a party to the action.

(b) The United States, unless the United States is individually joined as a party to the action and federal law authorizes judgment in the action to be binding or conclusive as to its interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 271, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

764.080.

(a) In any action brought to quiet title to land that has been subject to an agreement entered into pursuant to Section 6307 or 6357 of the Public Resources Code, at the time set for trial the court shall, at the request of any party, receive evidence on the nature of the agreement. After receiving that evidence, the court shall render a statement of decision. In the case of an agreement pursuant to Section 6357, the statement of decision shall include a recitation of the underlying facts and a determination whether the agreement meets the criteria of Section 6357 and other law applicable to the validity of boundary line
agreements. In the case of an agreement pursuant to Section 6307, the statement of decision shall recite the relevant facts and shall contain a determination whether the requirements of Section 6307 of the Public Resources Code, Sections 3 and 4 of Article 10 of the California Constitution, and other applicable law have been met. If the court finds the agreement to be valid, the judgment in the action shall quiet title in the parties named in the agreement in accordance with the agreement. If the judgment is entered prior to the effective date of the agreement, the judgment shall provide that, upon the effective date, title is quieted in the parties in accordance with the agreements. However, no action may be brought pursuant to this section until the State Lands Commission has approved the agreement following a public hearing. All such actions shall be set on the trial calendar within one year from the filing of a memorandum to set, unless the court extends this time for good cause.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of members of the public to bring or participate in actions challenging the validity of agreements entered into pursuant to Section 6307 or 6357 of the Public Resources Code. Any action brought by a member of the public shall be set on the trial calendar within one year from the filing of a memorandum to set, unless the court extends this time for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1045, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Liens and Encumbrances [765.010. - 765.060.]

765.010.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Harass” means engage in knowing and willful conduct that serves no legitimate purpose.

(2) “Entity” includes both governmental and private entities.

(b) A person shall
not file or record, or direct another to file or record, a lawsuit, lien, or other encumbrance, including a notice of lis pendens, against another person or entity knowing it is false, with the intent to harass the person or entity or to influence or hinder the person in discharging his or her official duties if the person is a public officer or employee.

(c) (1) A person or entity whose property is subject to a lien or encumbrance in violation of this section may petition the superior court of the county in which the person or entity resides or in which the property is located for an order, which may be granted ex parte, directing the lien or other encumbrance claimant to appear at a hearing before the court and show cause why the lien or other encumbrance should not be stricken and other relief provided by this article should not be granted.

(2) The court
shall schedule the hearing no earlier than 14 days after the date of the order. The scheduled date of the hearing shall allow adequate time for notice of the hearing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   (AB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

765.020.

A petition under this article shall state the grounds upon which relief is requested, and shall be supported by the affidavit of the petitioner or the petitioner’s attorney setting forth a concise statement of the facts upon which the motion is based.

The petition and affidavit shall be in substantially the form prescribed by the Judicial Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

765.030.

If the court determines that the lien or other encumbrance is in violation of Section 765.010, the court shall issue an order striking and releasing the lien or other encumbrance and may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the petitioner to be paid by the lien or other encumbrance claimant. If the court determines that the lien or other encumbrance is valid, the court shall issue an order so stating and may
award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the encumbrance claimant to be paid by the petitioner. The court may direct that an order issued pursuant to this section be recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 25.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

765.040.

Any lien or encumbrance claimant who records or files, or directs another to record or file, a lawsuit, lien, or other encumbrance in violation of Section 765.010 shall be liable to the person subject to the lawsuit or the owner of the property bound by the lien or other encumbrance for a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 208, Sec. 4.   (AB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

765.050.

This article does not apply to a document which acts as a claim of encumbrance by a financial institution, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14161 of the Penal Code or Section 481.113 of this code, or a public entity, as defined in Section 481.200 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

765.060.

If a lien or other encumbrance is recorded or filed against a public officer or employee in violation of Section 765.010, the state or local agency that employs the public officer or employee may provide counsel for the public officer or employee in an action brought pursuant to that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 208, Sec. 5.   (AB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Special Actions and Proceedings to Clear Title [770.010. - 772.060.]



  ARTICLE 1. Identity of Person in Chain of Title [770.010. - 770.080.]

770.010.

As used in this article:

(a) “Acquired” means received or taken by conveyance, judgment, decree, or otherwise.

(b) “Property” means any right, title, or interest in or lien upon real property or part thereof.

(c) “Subsequent owner” means the person to whom property is transferred whether as owner, part owner, or otherwise, or the successors in interest of the person, and includes a distributee of the estate of a decedent.

(d) “Transfer” means voluntary or involuntary transfer and includes a conveyance, reconveyance, satisfaction of a lien, or divestment by judgment, decree, or otherwise. The probate of the estate of a decedent and entry of the decree of distribution is a transfer within the meaning of this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.020.

If property is acquired or stands of record in the name of a person who heretofore or hereafter transfers the property under a name other than or different from the name in which the property is acquired or stands of record, a proceeding is authorized to adjudicate and determine the identity of the person in whose name the property is acquired or stands of record and the person who transfers the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.030.

The proceeding shall be brought in the superior court of the county in which the property or any part thereof is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.040.

(a) The proceeding may be brought by a subsequent owner of the property by filing a petition with the court.

(b) At any time before the date fixed for the hearing of the petition, any person interested in the property may answer the petition and deny any of the matters contained therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.050.

(a) The petition shall be verified in the manner provided for verification of a complaint.

(b) The petition may be substantially entitled, “In the matter of the determination of the identity of ____” (naming all the persons sought to be identified), and may set forth:

(1) A statement of petitioner’s interest in the property as subsequent owner. 

(2) A particular description of the property.

(3) The name or names of the person or persons sought to be identified, setting out the name and a reference to the record of the transaction under which the property was acquired or stands of record and the name and a reference to the record of the transaction under which the property was transferred or stands of record, that the names are the names of the same person, and that the transfers affect the petitioner’s title to the real property.

(4) A prayer that the identity of such persons be established.

(c) As many persons sought to be identified as appear of record in the chain of title to the property may be joined in one petition or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.060.

(a) Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk shall set the petition for hearing by the court.

(b) The petitioner shall give notice of the hearing by causing notices of the time and place of hearing to be posted at the courthouse of the county where the proceeding is pending and in a conspicuous place on the real property described in the petition, at least 10 days before the hearing.

(c) The special notice shall be substantially in the following form:

(Title of court and cause)

Notice is hereby given that ____ has filed a petition herein claiming to be the owner (or distributee) of the following described lands ____ (description) and praying that the identity of the following-named persons, in former conveyances (or judgments or decrees) to said lands or in decrees of distribution of said lands in probate be determined, to wit: ________ (names as J. Doe and John Doe); and that the time and place of hearing said petition has been set for ____ the ____ day of ____, 19__, at the hour of ____, __m. of said day at the courtroom of said court in the City of ____, County of ____, State of California.Clerk

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.070.

(a) At the time fixed for the hearing or such time thereafter as may be fixed by the court, the court shall hear the proofs offered by the petitioner and by any persons answering the petition, and shall make and enter a decree determining the identity of the person or persons set out in the petition in accordance with the proofs.

(b) An appeal may be taken by any party aggrieved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

770.080.

(a) After the decree has become final it constitutes prima facie evidence of the matters thereby determined and it is presumed that the identity of the person or persons described in the decree is such as is stated in the decree.

(b) A certified copy of the decree shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of every county in which any part of the property is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Land Dedicated for Public Improvement [771.010. - 771.020.]

771.010.

If a proposal is heretofore or hereafter made to dedicate real property for public improvement, there is a conclusive presumption that the proposed dedication was not accepted if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The proposal was made by filing a map only.

(b) No acceptance of the dedication was made and recorded within 25 years after the map was filed.

(c) The real property was not used for the purpose for which the dedication was proposed
within 25 years after the map was filed.

(d) The real property was sold to a third person after the map was filed and used as if free of the dedication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

771.020.

(a) An action is authorized to clear title to real property of a proposal to dedicate the property for public improvement if there is a conclusive presumption pursuant to Section 771.010 that the proposed dedication was not accepted.

(b) The action shall be pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 760.010) and shall have the following features:

(1) The public entity to which the dedication was proposed shall be named as defendant.

(2) The judgment in the action shall clear the title of the proposed dedication and remove the cloud created by the proposed dedication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Right of Entry or Occupation of Surface Lands Under Oil or Gas Lease [772.010. - 772.060.]

772.010.

This article applies only to lands within a city in any county with a population exceeding 4,000,000, or with a population of more than 700,000 and less than 710,000 as determined by the 1960 Federal Decennial Census.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

772.020.

As used in this article:

(a) “Surface zone” means the zone which lies above a plane which is 500 feet below the surface of the land.

(b) “Subject land” means that area occupied by the particular described surface and surface zone for which plaintiff seeks to terminate the leasehold right of entry and occupation.

(c) “Lease facilities” means storage tanks, wash tanks, separators, heaters, and other facilities reasonably necessary for the production of oil or
gas, including secondary recovery operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

772.030.

(a) If a mining rights lease, including a community lease, exists for the production of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons, and a right of entry or occupation provided by the lease encumbers all or part of the surface or surface zone of the leasehold lands, any person who owns a fee interest in the surface of the leasehold lands may bring an action in the superior court to terminate the right of entry or occupation as to all or some described portion of the surface and surface zone of the leasehold lands in which the person owns an interest. 

(b) No judgment rendered
pursuant to this article shall change or affect the terms or operation of any valid unit agreement or valid operating agreement which comes within the provisions of Section 3301 or 3321 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

772.040.

The court may render a judgment terminating the lessee’s right of entry or occupation of the surface and surface zone, subject to such conditions as the court deems fair and equitable, if the evidence shows each of the following:

(a) The document that created the leasehold interest was originally executed more than 20 years prior to filing the action under this article regardless of any amendments to the document. However, if any amendment was entered into expressly for the purpose of waiving, limiting, or rearranging surface rights of entry and occupation by the lessee, the 20-year
period shall be computed as if the document were originally executed on the date of execution of the amendment.

(b) The subject land is not presently occupied by any of the following:

(1) A producing oil or gas well or well bore.

(2) A well or well bore being utilized for injection of water, gas, or other substance into geologic substrata as an aid to oil or gas production or to ameliorating subsidence.

(3) A well or well bore being utilized for the disposal injection of waste oil well brine and byproducts.

(4) A well or well bore being utilized for the production of water for use in oil field injection, waterflood, and pressure maintenance programs.

(c) Termination of the right of entry or occupation within the subject land in the manner requested by the plaintiff, or subject to such conditions as the court may impose pursuant to this section, will not significantly interfere with the right of the lessee, under the lease, to continue to conduct operations for the continued production of oil from leasehold strata beneath the surface zone in a practical and economic manner, utilizing such production techniques as will be appropriate to the leasehold area, consistent with good oilfield practice, and to gather, transport, and market the oil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

772.050.

(a) The court may qualify the judgment terminating the surface and surface zone right of entry or occupation so as to provide for limited surface and surface zone easements that the lessee may continue to enjoy within the subject land.

(b) A judgment may be conditioned upon the relocation of pipelines, roadways, equipment, or lease facilities in such manner as will most effectively free the subject land for surface use while safeguarding continued oil and gas operations in a practical and economic manner. Any such condition of the judgment shall require the
plaintiff to pay the costs of the relocation. However, the plaintiff shall be entitled to a setoff against the costs to the extent of any benefit to the lessee resulting from the installation of new equipment or material. The plaintiff has the burden of proving any benefit accruing to the lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

772.060.

It is against public policy for any oil or gas lease, at its inception, to provide for the waiver of any rights created by this article, or for such rights to be waived by amendment to any oil or gas lease within 20 years of the date of its execution by a plaintiff or the plaintiff’s predecessor in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. Actions Concerning Real Property Titles Affected by Public Improvement Assessments [801.1. - 801.15.]

801.1.

An action may be brought to determine adverse interests in, liens or clouds upon title to real property arising out of any public improvement assessment or any bond issued to represent such assessment where the lien of such assessment or bond is presumed to have been extinguished under the provisions of Section 2911 of the Civil Code, or to determine adverse interests in, liens or clouds upon title to real property by reason of any certificate issued on sale made to satisfy any public improvement assessment or bond where such sale was made more than four years prior to the commencement of the action and no deed pursuant thereto has been issued prior to the commencement of
 the action or prior to January 1, 1951, whichever is the later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.2.

The action may be brought as a separate action or joined as a cause with other causes of action to determine adverse claims to and clouds upon title to real property, but the complaint shall aver the pertinent matters stated in the preceding section and shall be verified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.3.

The complaint shall include as defendants to the action (a) all persons known to the plaintiff owning or claiming an interest under such public improvement assessment, bond or certificate of sale; (b) the payee, as shown by the bond representing the assessment, if any; (c) the owner of the special assessment or certificate of sale, if any, and any person claiming an interest therein, as shown by the records of the treasurer, street superintendent or other public official who is the custodian of the funds to be collected thereon or who issued such certificate of sale, and (d) such
 treasurer, street superintendent or other public official. If any person owning or claiming an interest under such assessment, bond or certificate of sale is known to be dead, the heirs and devisees of such person may be sued as: “the heirs and devisees of” said person, naming him, or if such person is believed to be dead and such belief is alleged in the complaint on information and belief then the heirs and devisees of such person may also be sued as “the heirs and devisees” of said person, naming him, provided that such person is also named as a defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

801.4.

The complaint shall also include, as defendants, unknown persons owning or claiming an interest in such bond, special assessment or certificate of sale and they may be described in the complaint as: “Also the owner or any person claiming an interest (here describe the bond, special assessment or certificate of sale as it is described in the office in which it was issued).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.5.

Within ten days after the filing of the complaint, plaintiff shall file or cause to be filed in the office of the recorder of the county where the property is situated, a notice of the pendency of the action, containing the title and object of the action and a description of the property in that county affected thereby. From the time of filing such notice of record only, shall all persons have constructive notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.6.

Within three years after the filing of the complaint, a summons shall be issued which shall contain the matters required by Section 412.20, designating the defendants as in the complaint, and in addition, a description of the property and a statement of the object of the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

801.7.

Within thirty days after the issuance of the summons, the plaintiff shall post, or cause to be posted, a copy thereof in a conspicuous place on the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.8.

All known defendants shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action. All unknown defendants shall be served by publication as provided in Section 750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

801.9.

In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the affidavit by the plaintiff for publication of summons, it shall appear by the affidavit that the plaintiff used reasonable diligence to ascertain the identity and residence of the unknown defendants and of any persons sued as heirs and devisees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

801.10.

All unknown defendants, including the heirs and devisees designated in the complaint, shall have the same rights as are provided by law for other defendants upon whom summons is served, and the action shall proceed against them in the same manner. Regardless of any legal disability, any unknown defendant, including any heir or devisee designated in the complaint, who has been served, and anyone claiming under him, shall be concluded by a judgment in the action as if the action were brought against and personal service made upon that person by his or her name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

801.11.

On the trial of the action, the court shall determine the rights of all the parties thereto and shall require proof of the facts alleged. Any certificate issued on sale made to satisfy any public improvement assessment or any bond issued to represent such assessment shall be presumed to have been paid and redeemed where no deed pursuant thereto has been issued and such sale was made more than four years prior to the commencement of the action.

The presumption herein mentioned shall become and be conclusive if no deed pursuant to such sale is issued within four years after the date of sale or prior to January 1, 1953, whichever
 is the later; and no public official shall thereafter execute or issue any deed pursuant to such sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

801.12.

If the court determines that none of the defendants have any right, title, interest, lien or estate in the property, it shall render its final decree quieting the plaintiff’s title. If the court determines that any of the defendants have any right, title, interest, lien or estate in the property, it shall render its decree establishing these rights and may order the sale of the property or partition thereof. The decree shall direct the public officer having the record of the assessment, bond or certificate of sale to cancel the record thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.13.

If the court orders a sale of the property or a partition thereof, the same shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Title 10.5 (commencing with Section 872.010) of Part 2, except that proceeds of sale belonging to unknown defendants or defendants whose identities or whereabouts are unascertained shall be paid to the public officer who is the custodian of the funds collected on such public improvement assessments, bonds or certificates of sale, to be held by him as in like instances of collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

801.14.

The decree, after it has become final, is conclusive against all persons named in the complaint who have been served and all unknown persons and the heirs and devisees of deceased persons designated in the complaint and served as hereinbefore provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

801.15.

After the judgment has become final, a certified copy thereof shall be delivered to the public officer having the record of the assessment, bond or certificate of sale in his office and he shall thereupon mark the record of the assessment, bond or certificate of sale as follows: “Canceled by judgment of court, superior court case number (here give number).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Actions for the Usurpation of an Office or Franchise [802. - 811.]

802.

The writ of sire facies is abolished.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

An action may be brought by the attorney-general, in the name of the people of this state, upon his own information, or upon a complaint of a private party, against any person who usurps, intrudes into, or unlawfully holds or exercises any public office, civil or military, or any franchise, or against any corporation, either de jure or de facto, which usurps, intrudes into, or unlawfully holds or exercises any franchise, within this state. And the attorney-general must bring the action, whenever he has reason to believe that any such office or franchise has been usurped, intruded into, or unlawfully held or exercised by any person, or when he is directed to do so by the
 governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 324.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

Whenever such action is brought, the Attorney General, in addition to the statement of the cause of action, may also set forth in the complaint the name of the person rightly entitled to the office, with a statement of his right thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

In every such action judgment may be rendered upon the right of the defendant, and also upon the right of the party so alleged to be entitled, or only upon the right of the defendant, as justice may require.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

If the judgment be rendered upon the right of the person so alleged to be entitled, and the same be in favor of such person, he will be entitled, after taking the oath of office and executing such official bond as may be required by law, to take upon himself the execution of the office.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

If judgment be rendered upon the right of the person so alleged to be entitled, in favor of such person, he may recover, by action, the damages which he may have sustained by reason of the usurpation of the office by the defendant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

When several persons claim to be entitled to the same office or franchise, one action may be brought against all such persons, in order to try their respective rights to such office or franchise.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

809.
